District of Columbia statutes.
36-156

Recorder of Deeds to make regulations.

The Recorder of Deeds of the District of Columbia is authorized to make regulations and prescribe forms for the filing of labels, trademarks, or other distinctive marks under the provisions of this subchapter.

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 878f
Feb. 27, 1907, 34 Stat. 1007, ch. 2086
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
July 5, 1966, 80 Stat. 263, Pub. L. 89-493, § 6
1981 Ed., § 48-306.
1973 Ed., § 48-306.